Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-103
Petition; hearing;
notice.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska
Indian Child Welfare Act, upon the filing of a petition for adoption the court shall
fix a time for hearing the same.
The hearing shall be held not
less than four weeks nor more than eight weeks after the filing of such petition unless any party for good cause shown
requests a continuance of the hearing or all parties agree to a continuance.
The court may require notice of the hearing to be given to the child, if over
fourteen years of age, to the natural parent or parents of the child, and
to such other interested persons as the judge may, in the exercise of discretion,
deem advisable, in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil
action. If the judge directs notice by publication, such notice shall be published
three successive weeks in a legal newspaper of general circulation in such
county.

Laws 1943, c. 104, § 3, p. 349;

R.S.1943, § 43-103;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 50;

Laws 1985, LB 255, § 19;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 27.

Juveniles in need of assistance under Nebraska Juvenile Code, notice requirements, see section 43-297.

Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act, see section 43-1501.

This section and sections 43-102 and 43-104, construed together, require that before a county court entertains a decision on the merits in an adoption proceeding, all those statutorily required to consent have done so. In re Adoption of Chase T., 295 Neb. 390, 888 N.W.2d 507 (2016).